Utah statutes.
62A-3-316.   Costs incurred in providing of protective services.

Costs incurred in providing protective services are the responsibility of the vulnerable adult when:

(1)  the vulnerable adult is financially able to pay for those services, according to rates established by the division, and that payment is provided for as part of the written agreement for services described in Section 62A-3-315;

(2)  the vulnerable adult to be protected is eligible for those services from another governmental agency; or

(3)  the court appoints a guardian or conservator and orders that the costs be paid from the vulnerable adult’s estate.



Enacted by Chapter 108, 2002 General Session

